Utah statutes.
78A-7-110.   Docket to be kept -- Enumeration of entries required.

Every justice court judge shall keep or cause to be kept a docket.  The following information shall be entered in the docket under the title of the action to which it relates:

(1)  the title to every action or proceeding;

(2)  the object of the action or proceeding, and the amount of any money claimed;

(3)  the date of the service of the summons and the time of its return;

(4)  a statement of the fact if an order to arrest the defendant is made or a writ of attachment is issued;

(5)  the time when the parties or any party appears, or a party's nonappearance, if default is made;

(6)  minutes of the pleadings and motions in writing by referring to them, and if not in writing, by a concise statement of the material parts of the pleadings;

(7)  every adjournment, stating on whose application and to what time;

(8)  a demand for a trial by jury, when made, by whom, and the order for the jury;

(9)  the time appointed for the return of the jury and for the trial;

(10)  the names of the jurors who appear and are sworn;

(11)  the names of all witnesses sworn and at whose request;

(12)  the verdict of the jury and when received, or if the jury disagree and are discharged, the disagreement and discharge;

(13)  the judgment of the court including the costs included and when entered;

(14)  an itemized statement of the costs;

(15)  the time of issuing an execution and to whom, and the time of any renewals;

(16)  a statement of any money paid to the court, when, and by whom; and

(17)  the receipt of any notice of appeal, and of any appeal bond filed.

